Washington statutes.
RCW 22.32.030

Fraudulent tampering with or mixing goods.

Every person mentioned in RCW 22.32.020, who shall fraudulently mix or tamper with any goods, wares or merchandise under his or her control, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 653; 1909 c 249 s 393; RRS s 2645.]